Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1423
Franchise; contract; fulfillment; violation; damages.

Every franchisor and franchisee shall fulfill the terms of any express or implied warranty concerning the sale of a motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer, motorcycle, or trailer to the public of the line-make which is the subject of a contract or franchise agreement between the parties. If it is determined by the district court that either the franchisor or franchisee, or both, have violated an express or implied warranty, the court shall add to any award or relief granted an additional award for reasonable attorney fees and other necessary expenses for maintaining the litigation.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 23.